North Carolina, session 2025, HB865.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 67-4.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 67-4.1. Definitions and procedures.
(a) As used in this Article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise and except as
modified in subsection (b) of this section, the term:
(1) "Dangerous dog" means
a. A a dog that:
1.a. Without provocation has killed or inflicted severe injury on a
person; or
2.b. Is determined by the person or Board designated by the county
or municipal authority responsible for animal control to be
potentially dangerous because the dog has engaged in one or
more of the behaviors listed in subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
b. Any dog owned or harbored primarily or in part for the purpose of dog
fighting, or any dog trained for dog fighting.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 67-4.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 67-4.5. Local ordinances.
Nothing in this Article shall be construed to prevent a city or county from adopting or
enforcing its own program for control of dangerous dogs.dogs consistent with this Article."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
*H865-v-1*